src/fst/affixes/particles.lexc
!! !!!Particles
!! ----
!! Komi Particles


LEXICON PCLE_
: WordEnd ;

!LEXICON PCLE-AUX-IMP_
!+Aux+Imprt: WordEnd ;
!LEXICON PCLE-AUX_
!+Aux: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PcleIntens
+Intens: WordEnd ;

LEXICON ONOM_
+Onom: WordEnd ;

!LEXICON DESCR-End
! DescrTag ;
LEXICON DESCR_
+Descr: WordEnd ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
